Nebraska, session 109, LB574.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB574 LB574
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Complaint means a formal written allegation made against a
firefighter or a signed written statement made by the officer receiving
the complaint;
(b) Firefighter means any certified firefighter or emergency
personnel, including emergency medical technicians and paramedics;
(c) Formal investigation means an investigation ordered by a
commanding officer to determine whether disciplinary action, such as
removal, suspension, or discharge, is necessary based on a complaint; and
(d) Interview means the questioning of a firefighter during a formal
investigation that may lead to disciplinary action.
(2) When any formal investigation is conducted regarding a
firefighter:
(a) The formal investigation shall be completed in a reasonable
timeframe;
(b) A written summary of any complaint about a firefighter shall be
given to such firefighter before the firefighter participates in an
interview;
(c) Any firefighter may have legal representation or a union
representative present at any hearing, interview, or disciplinary
proceeding regarding such firefighter;
(d) Any interview shall be recorded using an audio recording device;
(e) A written notice of the outcome of the formal investigation
regarding a firefighter shall be sent to such firefighter;
(f) All complaints, statements, and interview recordings shall
remain confidential, unless disclosure is required by law or written
consent is given by the firefighter who is the subject of such
information;
(g) A firefighter may seek damages, including compensation for
attorney's fees and other costs, for false complaints filed against the
firefighter;
-2-

LB574 LB574
2025 2025
(h) A firefighter may challenge any disciplinary action against him
or her through an established grievance procedure, including union or
legal channels; and
(i) No firefighter shall be compelled to submit to a polygraph
examination.
(3) Each firefighter shall have the right to work in safe conditions
and shall have access to appropriate training, equipment, and support.
(4) Each firefighter shall have access to mental health services to
address job-related stress and trauma.
(5) The personal information of each firefighter shall remain
confidential, unless disclosure is required by law or written consent is
given by such firefighter.
(6) Any firefighter may engage in political activity or file for any
elective office while off-duty.
(7) Any firefighter may request access to his or her personnel and
training records at any time.
-3-